California, session 20252026, SB850.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 7522.75 is added to the Government Code, to read:7522.75. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision, a public employee who is a correctional officer or other prison staff member that If a correctional officer or other prison staff member employed by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, who is a current member of a public retirement system, is convicted of sexually assaulting an inmate within the state prison system shall system, that member shall, upon conviction pursuant to Section 7522.70, 7522.72, or 7522.74, as applicable, from the earliest date of commission of the crime, forfeit all accrued rights and benefits in any public retirement system in which that public employee is a member, the public retirement system to the extent provided in subdivision (b), (c), and shall not accrue further benefits in that the public retirement system.(b)(1)The public employee shall forfeit all of the rights and benefits earned or accrued from the date the employee was first hired with the public retirement system. The rights and benefits shall remain forfeited notwithstanding any reduction in sentence or expungement of the conviction following the date of the member’s conviction.(2)Any contributions to the public retirement system made by the public employee, as described in subdivision (a), shall not be returned to the public employee upon the occurrence of a conviction resulting in forfeiture, except as provided in subdivision (f).(b) If a correctional officer or other prison staff member employed by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, who first becomes a member of a public retirement system on or after January 1, 2026, is convicted of sexually assaulting an inmate within the state prison system, that member shall, upon conviction pursuant to Section 7522.70, 7522.72, or 7522.74, as applicable, forfeit all accrued rights and benefits in the public retirement system, to the extent provided in subdivision (c), and shall not accrue further benefits in the public retirement system.(c) (1) A member as described in subdivision (a) or (b) shall forfeit all of the rights and benefits earned or accrued from the date that they first became a member of the public retirement system except as provided in subdivision (h). The rights and benefits shall remain forfeited notwithstanding any reduction in sentence or expungement of the conviction following the date of the member’s conviction.(2) (A) Pursuant to regulations adopted by the public retirement system board, any contributions to the public retirement system made by a member, as described in subdivision (a), shall be returned to the public employee upon the occurrence of a conviction resulting in forfeiture.(B) Pursuant to regulations adopted by the public retirement system board, any contributions to the public retirement system made by a member, as described in subdivision (b), shall not be returned to the public employee upon the occurrence of a conviction resulting in forfeiture.(c)(d) (1) Upon conviction, a public employee, member, as described in subdivision (a), (a) or (b), and the prosecuting agency shall notify the public employer who employed the public employee member at the time of the commission of the felony within 60 days of the felony conviction of both of the following:(A) The date of conviction.(B) The date of the first known commission of the felony.(2) The operation of this section is not dependent upon the performance of the notification obligations specified in this subdivision.(d)(e) The public employer that employs or employed a public employee member described in subdivision (a) or (b) and that public employee member shall each notify each the member’s public retirement system in which the public employee is a member of that public employee’s of that member’s conviction within 90 days of the conviction. The operation of this section is not dependent upon the performance of the notification obligations specified in this subdivision.(e)(f) A public retirement system may assess a public employer a reasonable amount to reimburse the cost of audit, adjustment, or correction, if it determines that the public employer failed to comply with this section. The amount assessed shall not exceed the reasonable regulatory costs to the retirement system.(f)(g) If a public employee’s member’s conviction is reversed and that decision is final, the employee member shall be entitled to do either of the following:(1) Recover the forfeited rights and benefits.(2) Redeposit any contributions and interest that would have accrued during the forfeiture period, as determined by the system actuary, and then recover the full amount of the forfeited rights and benefits.(g)(h) The public retirement system shall implement this section in a manner that protects an innocent spouse or former spouse and is consistent with existing law governing the division of community property, including, but not limited to, Section 2610 of the Family Code.(h)(i) This section shall apply to the extent permissible by law.(i)This section shall apply retroactively and prospectively to any public employee described in subdivision (a), regardless of that public employee’s date of hire.SEC. 2. Article 8 (commencing with Section 2049) is added to Chapter 1 of Title 1 of Part 3 of the Penal Code, to read: Article 8. Central California Women’s Facility2049. There is and shall continue to be a state prison known as the Central California Women’s Facility, which is located in the City of Chowchilla.2049.1. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall construct and establish one new building with 100 additional single-cell housing units at the Central California Women’s Facility for the confinement of women under the custody of the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.SEC. 3. Section 5030 is added to the Penal Code, to read:5030. (a) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall do all of the following in all women’s state prison facilities:(1) Install fixed cameras by January 1, 2028, in all designated locations that have been ordered by the court or the Legislature.(2) Install thermal sensor cameras that track body movements in inmate bathrooms.(3) Eliminate solo shifts for correctional officers.(b) A correctional lieutenant on the site of a state prison facility shall have the authority to, upon request by an inmate, transfer that inmate to restrictive housing.SEC. 4. The provisions of this act are severable. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.